Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2651.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 107(a) of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Planning Code, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 107. Definitions.--(a) The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Combined energy generation and storage facility," a solar energy facility or wind energy facility that is paired with an energy storage facility and has a maximum facility output of at least two megawatts and the technical capacity to deliver the maximum facility output for a minimum duration of at least four hours.* * *"Energy storage facility," a facility located in this Commonwealth that employs technology, including electrochemical, thermal or electromechanical technology or a technology defined as "energy storage technology" in 26 U.S.C. § 48E (relating to clean energy investment credit) or 26 CFR 1.48E-2(g)(6) (relating to qualified investments in qualified facilities and EST for purposes of section 48E) on the effective date of this definition, that is capable of absorbing and storing energy for use at a later time, is designed primarily to store energy for, and is connected to, the wholesale or distribution grid and has a maximum facility output of at least five megawatts and the technical capacity to deliver the maximum facility output for a minimum duration of at least four hours.* * *"Renewable energy facility," a solar energy facility, wind energy facility, energy storage facility or combined energy generation and storage facility.20260HB2651PN3664 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Solar energy facility," a system that captures and converts solar energy into electricity for sale or for use in locations other than solely on the property of the solar energy facility, is connected to the wholesale or distribution grid and has a nameplate capacity of at least two megawatts.* * *"Wind energy facility," a system that captures and converts wind into electricity for sale or for use in locations other than solely on the property of the wind energy facility, is connected to the wholesale or distribution grid and has a nameplate capacity of at least two megawatts.* * *Section 2. Section 301(a)(6)(viii) and (ix) of the act are amended and the paragraph is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 301. Preparation of Comprehensive Plan--(a) The municipal, multimunicipal or county comprehensive plan, consisting of maps, charts and textual matter, shall include, but need not be limited to, the following related basic elements:* * *(6) A plan for the protection of natural and historic resources to the extent not preempted by Federal or State law. This clause includes, but is not limited to, wetlands and aquifer recharge zones, woodlands, steep slopes, prime agricultural land, flood plains, unique natural areas and historic sites. The plan shall be consistent with and may not exceed those requirements imposed under the following:* * *20260HB2651PN3664 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), entitled "An act protecting agricultural operations from nuisance suits and ordinances under certain circumstances"; [and](ix) act of May 20, 1993 (P.L.12, No.6), known as the "Nutrient Management Act," regardless of whether any agricultural operation within the area to be affected by the plan is a concentrated animal operation as defined under the act[.]; and(x) Article VI-A.* * *Section 3. Section 503(1) introductory paragraph of the act is amended to read:Section 503. Contents of Subdivision and Land Development Ordinance.--The subdivision and land development ordinance may include, but need not be limited to:(1) Provisions for the submittal and processing of plats, including the charging of review fees, and specifications for such plats, including certification as to the accuracy of plats and provisions for preliminary and final approval and for processing of final approval by stages or sections of development. Review fees for the development and construction of a renewable energy facility shall be subject to section 606-A . Such plats and surveys shall be prepared in accordance with the act of May 23, 1945 (P.L.913, No.367), known as the "Engineer, Land Surveyor and Geologist Registration Law," except that this requirement shall not preclude the preparation of a plat in accordance with the act of January 24, 1966 (1965 P.L.1527, No.535), known as the "Landscape Architects' Registration Law," when it is 20260HB2651PN3664 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriate to prepare the plat using professional services as set forth in the definition of the "practice of landscape architecture" under section 2 of that act. Review fees may include reasonable and necessary charges by the municipality's professional consultants for review and report thereon to the municipality. Such review fees shall be based upon a schedule established by ordinance or resolution. Such review fees shall be reasonable and in accordance with the ordinary and customary charges for similar service in the community, but in no event shall the fees exceed the rate or cost charged by the professional consultant for comparable services to the municipality for services which are not reimbursed or otherwise imposed on applicants. Fees charged to the municipality relating to any appeal of a decision on an application shall not be considered review fees and may not be charged to an applicant.* * *Section 4. Section 603(b) introductory paragraph of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 603. Ordinance Provisions.--* * *(b) Zoning ordinances, except to the extent that those regulations of mineral extraction by local ordinances and enactments have heretofore been superseded and preempted by the act of May 31, 1945 (P.L.1198, No.418), known as the "Surface Mining Conservation and Reclamation Act," the act of December 19, 1984 (P.L.1093, No.219), known as the "Noncoal Surface Mining Conservation and Reclamation Act," and the act of December 19, 1984 (P.L.1140, No.223), known as the "Oil and Gas Act," and to the extent that the subsidence impacts of coal 20260HB2651PN3664 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 extraction are regulated by the act of April 27, 1966 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.31, No.1), known as "The Bituminous Mine Subsidence and Land Conservation Act," and that regulation of activities related to commercial agricultural production would exceed the requirements imposed under the act of May 20, 1993 (P.L.12, No.6), known as the "Nutrient Management Act," regardless of whether any agricultural operation within the area to be affected by the ordinance would be a concentrated animal operation as defined by the "Nutrient Management Act," the act of June 30, 1981 (P.L.128, No.43), known as the "Agricultural Area Security Law," or the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), entitled "An act protecting agricultural operations from nuisance suits and ordinances under certain circumstances," and that regulation of activities related to the siting of a renewable energy facility would exceed the requirements imposed under Article VI-A, or that regulation of other activities are preempted by other Federal or State laws, may permit, prohibit, regulate, restrict and determine:* * *(m) Zoning ordinances shall provide for the development and construction of renewable energy facilities in each municipality in a manner consistent with Article VI-A.Section 5. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE VI-ARENEWABLE ENERGY SITING STANDARDSSection 601-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this art icle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cumulative environmental impact." The existing and 20260HB2651PN3664 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reasonably foreseeable environmental and public health impact of pollution in a defined geographic area resulting from pollution of land, water or ambient air, including a reasonably foreseeable upstream or downstream impact, regardless of whether the pollution has been authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth."Unauthorized local ordinance." An ordinance adopted or enforced by a municipality that prohibits or unreasonably delays, impedes or prevents the construction, operation or maintenance of a renewable energy facility, unless the ordinance is necessary to protect public health, safety or welfare.Section 602-A. Ordinance compliance.(a) Amendment.--A municipality that has adopted a subdivision and land development ordinance or zoning ordinance that is inconsistent with this article shall amend the ordinance to comply with this article within six months of the effective date of this subsection.(b) Effect of inconsistency.--After the expiration of the period under subsection (a), a provision of a subdivision and land development ordinance or zoning ordinance that is inconsistent with this article shall be unenforceable to the extent of the inconsistency.(c) Remedies.--A failure to comply with this section may be addressed under section 608-A or any other applicable provision of this act.Section 603-A. Regulation of renewable energy facilities.(a) Existing approval procedure.--A municipality that permits a renewable energy facility through a special exception or conditional use on the effective date of this subsection shall comply with the procedures and requirements under this 20260HB2651PN3664 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 article.(b) Permitted zoning districts.--A municipality shall permit the development and construction of a renewable energy facility by right, special exception or conditional use in an area zoned for agricultural or industrial use.(c) Restriction.--A municipality may not adopt a permit requirement or zoning ordinance for the development and construction of a renewable energy facility that is more restrictive than the requirements under this article.(d) Technical assistance.--The Center for Local Government Services may provide technical assistance to a municipality to assist the municipality in adopting or amending an ordinance to comply with the procedures under this article.Section 604-A. Public participation.(a) Consultation.--Prior to filing an application for development, an applicant for the development of a renewable energy facility shall consult with the governing body of each municipality in which the renewable energy facility is proposed to be located.(b) Contents of consultation.--Consultation under subsection (a) shall include good faith efforts to meet with the governing body or the governing body's designee to discuss the proposed renewable energy facility. The discussion shall include all of the following:(1) Why the site was selected.(2) Alternative locations that the applicant considered.(3) Viewshed impacts.(4) Environmental impacts.(5) How the applicant plans to mitigate the impacts under paragraphs (3) and (4).20260HB2651PN3664 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Potential benefits to the community.(c) Community benefit agreement.--An applicant for the development of a renewable energy facility shall enter into a community benefit agreement with the governing body of each municipality in which the renewable energy facility is proposed to be located. The following requirements and procedures shall apply to a community benefit agreement:(1) The community benefit agreement shall require that, upon commencement of operation, the owner or operator of the renewable energy facility pay each affected municipality $1,000 total per megawatt of nameplate capacity located within the affected municipality. If a renewable energy facility is located in more than one municipality, thepayment under this paragraph shall be prorated among theaffected municipalities based on the portion of the projectarea located in each municipality. The affected governing body shall use the payment for police, fire, public safety or other infrastructure or for another project agreed to by the governing body and the applicant.(2) If an affected governing body refuses to enter into a community benefit agreement after good faith negotiations with the applicant, the applicant shall enter into a community benefit agreement with one or more community-based organizations within the municipality or serving residents of the municipality. The amount paid by the applicant under this paragraph must be at least equal to the amount that the applicant would pay to the affected municipality under paragraph (1).(3) A community benefit agreement shall prioritize benefits to the municipality in which the renewable energy 20260HB2651PN3664 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility is proposed to be located. The topics and specific terms of a community benefit agreement may vary and may include any of the following:(i) Workforce development, job quality and jo b access provisions.(ii) Funding for, or providing, specific environmental benefits.(iii) Funding for, or providing, specific community improvements or amenities, including park and playground equipment, urban greening, enhanced safety crossings, road paving and bike paths.(iv) Annual contributions to a nonprofit or community-based organization that awards grants.(4) A community benefit agreement is legally binding and inures to the benefit of the parties and their successors. The governing body shall enforce the requirement to enter into a community benefit agreement. A party to a community benefit agreement may enforce the community benefit agreement in a court of competent jurisdiction.(5) A community benefit agreement under this subsection may not bind the owner or operator of a renewable energy facility if the owner or operator withdraws the application for development or the renewable energy facility is not placed into service.(d) Technical reports.--At the time of the consu ltation under subsection (a), the applicant shall provide the governing body with a copy of each technical report concerning the need for the renewable energy facility. The information provided under this subsection shall include all of the following:(1) A map indicating the area of need.20260HB2651PN3664 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The location of existing surrounding facilities.(3) A detailed description of the proposed site under consideration.(4) A description of the site selection process undertaken by the prospective applicant.(5) The potential environmental impacts of the proposed renewable energy facility.(6) How the proposed renewable energy facility's potential impacts could affect cumulative environmental impacts in the municipality in which the facility is proposed to be located.(7) How the applicant plans to mitigate cumulative environmental impacts.Section 605-A. Siting standards for renewable energy facilities.(a) Maximum standards.--A zoning ordinance may in clude provisions regulating setback distances and heights of renewable energy facilities if the provisions do not exceed the following standards:(1) A solar energy facility shall comply with the following:(i) Setback distances must be measured from the nearest edge of an above-ground component of the facility, not including fencing.(ii) A setback distance of 50 feet from the lot lines of other unoccupied real property, electric substations and railroad, overhead utility line or transit rights-of-way.(iii) A setback distance of 150 feet from an existing school, public playground, public park, child-20260HB2651PN3664 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 care facility, church, meetinghouse or other actual place of regularly stated religious worship.(iv) A municipality may require vegetative screening, including plantings of less than five feet in height. When a municipality proposes to adopt screening requirements, the municipality shall consider the size and location of the facility, visibility from residential buildings, compatibility of native plant species, cost and feasibility of installation and maintenance and industry standards and best practices for solar energy facilities.(v) The height of a solar panel may not exceed 25 feet above ground when the solar energy facility's arrays are at full tilt.(vi) A municipality may require the owner or operator of the solar energy facility to maintain ground cover and topsoil at the site.(vii) A municipality shall require an applicant for the development of a solar energy facility to submit a decommissioning plan and proof of financial assurance. The applicant shall retain a third party with expertise in decommissioning to calculate the estimated cost to decommission the solar energy facility. The financial assurance shall be in an amount that is not less than the estimated cost to decommission the solar energy facility, after deducting salvage or recycling value.(2) An energy storage facility shall comply with the following:(i) Setback distances must be measured from the nearest edge of the nearest battery or other 20260HB2651PN3664 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electrochemical or electromechanical enclosure.(ii) A setback distance of 150 feet from a residential d welling or existing school, public playground, public park, child-care facility, church, meetinghouse or other actual place of regularly stated religious worship.(iii) A setback distance of 50 feet from the lot lines of other unoccupied real property, electric substations and railroad, overhead utility line or transit rights-of-way.(iv) A municipality may require vegetative screening, including plantings of less than five feet in height.(v) A municipality may require the energy storage facility to comply with National Fire Protection Association 855, Standard for the Installation of Stationary Energy Storage Systems as in effect on the effective date of this subparagraph.(vi) The perimeter of an energy storage facility must be enclosed by fencing of a height not greater than 25 feet.(vii) A municipality shall require an applicant for the development of an energy storage facility to submit a decommissioning plan and emergency response plan.(3) A wind energy facility shall comply with the following:(i) Setback distances must be measured from the center of the base of the wind tower.(ii) A setback distance of 2.1 times the maximum blade tip height of the wind tower from a residential 20260HB2651PN3664 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dwelling, existing school, public playground, public park, child-care facility, church, meetinghouse or other actual place of regularly stated religious worship or the lot line of an environmentally sensitive area or area of historic significance.(iii) A setback distance of 1.1 times the maximum blade tip height of the wind tower from the lot lines of other unoccupied real property, electric substations and railroad, overhead utility line or transit rights-of-way.(iv) A municipality may require limits on the blade tip height of a wind tower located at a wind energy facility if the requirements are not more restrictive than the height permitted under a Determination of No Hazard to Air Navigation issued by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR Pt. 77 (relating to safe, efficient use, and preservation of the navigable airspace).(v) The wind energy facility shall be sited so that industry-standard computer modeling indicates that a residential dwelling, existing school, public playground, public park, child-care facility, church, meetinghouse or other actual place of regularly stated religious worship will not experience more than 30 hours per year of shadow flicker under planned operations.(4) A renewable energy facility may not exceed 47 decibels measured within 30 feet of a residential dwelling, existing school, public playground, public park, child-care facility, church, meetinghouse or other actual place of regularly stated religious worship. After commercial operation, a municipality may require the owner or operator 20260HB2651PN3664 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a renewable energy facility to provide octave band sound pressure level measurements from a reasonable number of sampled locations at the perimeter of the renewable energy facility to demonstrate compliance with this paragraph.(b) Environmentally sensitive and historic areas.--A municipality may require a renewable energy facility to have an additional setback distance of 50 feet from an environmentally sensitive area or area of historic significance.(c) Waiver.--A municipality may waive a requirement under this section if each affected property owner provides written consent.(d) Negotiated setback distances.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a municipality and an applicant from negotiating larger setback distances based on the specific needs of the proposed development.(e) Other law.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt a renewable energy facility from the requirements of the National Electrical Code, National Electrical Safety Code, 34 Pa. Code Ch. 403 (relating to administration), 52 Pa. Code § 57.28 (relating to electric safety standards), the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act or another applicable Federal or State law.Section 606-A. Permit and application fees.(a) Reasonableness.--A municipality's application filing fees, review fees and impact fees for the development and construction of a renewable energy facility shall be reasonable and processed in accordance with a fee schedule or invoice.(b) Limitation.--Fees charged by a municipality for the development of a renewable energy facility may not exceed the 20260HB2651PN3664 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lesser of:(1) $1,000 per megawatt of nameplate capacity of the renewable energy facility; or(2) $100,000.(c) Reimbursement.--A municipality may require the applicant to reimburse the municipality for reasonable expenses incurred in processing an application that exceed $100,000.(d) Construction deadline.--Upon approval of an application for development, a municipality may not impose a deadline of less than five years to begin the construction or development of a renewable energy facility. A municipality shall permit an applicant to request an extension of the deadline for good cause shown.Section 607-A. Attorney General review.(a) Request.--A person aggrieved by the enactment or enforcement of a local ordinance that the person believes to be an unauthorized local ordinance may request that the Attorney General review the local ordinance and consider whether to bring an action under section 608-A.(b) Discretion.--The Attorney General shall have complete discretion to determine whether to bring an action under section 608-A.(c) Response.--Within 120 days of receiving a request under subsection (a), the Attorney General shall advise the aggrieved person in writing whether the Attorney General will bring an action against the municipality.Section 608-A. Right of action.(a) Attorney General.--Notwithstanding Article X-A, the Attorney General may bring an action against a municipality in Commonwealth Court to invalidate an unauthorized local ordinance 20260HB2651PN3664 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or enjoin the enforcement of an unauthorized local ordinance.(b) Aggrieved person.--Notwithstanding Article X-A or 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 Subch. C (relating to actions against local parties), a person aggrieved by the enactment or enforcement of an unauthorized local ordinance may bring an action against a municipality in Commonwealth Court to invalidate the unauthorized local ordinance or enjoin the enforcement of the unauthorized local ordinance.(c) Remedies.--In an action brought under subsection (b), the court may take any of the following actions:(1) If the court determines that the municipality enacted or enforced an unauthorized local ordinance with negligent disregard of the limitation of authority established under State law, order the municipality to pay the plaintiff reasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs incurred by the plaintiff in connection with the action.(2) If the court determines that the action brought by the plaintiff was frivolous or brought without substantial justification in claiming that the local ordinance was unauthorized, order the plaintiff to pay the municipality reasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs incurred by the municipality in defending the action.(d) Report.--The Attorney General shall provide an annual report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Energy Committee of the House of Representatives. The report must include all of the following:(1) The number of reviews requested, the nature of the 20260HB2651PN3664 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 complaints and the location of the ordinances cited.(2) The number of reviews conducted.(3) The number of legal actions brought by the Attorney General under subsection (a).(4) The outcome of legal actions brought by the Attorney General under subsection (a).Section 609-A. Certain actions prohibited.A municipality may not adopt or enforce an unauthorized local ordinance.Section 610-A. Applicability.Sections 607-A and 608-A shall apply to the enforcement of local ordinances existing on the effective date of this section and the enactment or enforcement of local ordinances on or after the effective date of this section.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2651PN3664 - 18 - 123456789101112131415